Georgia, session 2025_26, HB59.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 20-2-182 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to program
weights to reflect funds for payment of salaries and benefits, maximum class size, reporting
requirements, and application to specific school years, is amended by revising subsection (c)
as follows:
"(c) The program weights for the kindergarten, kindergarten early intervention, primary,
primary grades early intervention, upper elementary, upper elementary grades early
intervention, middle school, and alternative education programs and the program weights
for the high school programs authorized pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of
H. B. 59
- 1 -

LC 49 2045
Code Section 20-2-151, when multiplied by the base amount, shall reflect sufficient funds
to pay the beginning salaries for at least one school counselor for every 450 250 full-time
equivalent students. Beginning in Fiscal Year 2015 and thereafter, the program weights
for the English for speakers of other languages program and the programs for persons with
disabilities shall also earn school counselor funding. Further, beginning in Fiscal Year
2016 and thereafter, the program weights for the program for intellectually gifted students
and the remedial education program shall also earn school counselor funding. The duties
and responsibilities for such school counselors shall be established by the state board to
require a minimum of five of the six full-time equivalent program count segments of the
counselor's time to be spent counseling or advising students or parents."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 59
- 2 -